Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-124
Failure to apply payments for lawful claims; failure to discharge lien; penalty.

Any person, firm, or corporation, the members of any firm, or the officers of any corporation, violating the provisions of section 52-123 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1969, c. 432, § 2, p. 1456;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 308.